Florida, session 2026, SB1576.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 34 35 Section 1.âSection 366.043, Florida Statutes, is created to 36 read: 37 366.043âDisconnection of utilities.â 38 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 39 (a)ââExtreme weather eventâ means any event in which 40 weather, climate, or environmental conditions present a danger 41 to life or property, including, but not limited to, heavy 42 rainfall, flooding, storm surge, strong winds, a tropical storm 43 or depression, a hurricane, or a tornado. 44 (b)ââForecasted heat indexâ means the measure of how hot 45 the outdoor weather will feel to the human body when the effects 46 of humidity are added to high temperatures predicted by the 47 National Weather Service. 48 (c)ââWater utilityâ means a water or wastewater utility 49 including every person, lessee, trustee, or receiver owning, 50 operating, managing, controlling, or proposing the construction 51 of a system, which provides, or proposes to provide, water or 52 wastewater service to the public for compensation. 53 (2)âAn electric utility, a public utility, or a water 54 utility may not disconnect service to any residential customer 55 for the nonpayment of bills or fees if: 56 (a)âThe forecasted heat index is at or above 90 degrees 57 Fahrenheit for more than 3 consecutive hours within the 24 hours 58 before or after the scheduled disconnection; 59 (b)âThe forecasted temperature is at or below 32 degrees 60 Fahrenheit for more than 3 consecutive hours within 48 hours 61 before the scheduled disconnection; or 62 (c)âA state of emergency is declared for an extreme weather 63 event or public health emergency within 24 hours before or after 64 the scheduled disconnection. Scheduled service disconnections 65 may resume upon the shorter of either 24 hours after the state 66 of emergency is lifted or 60 days after the declaration of the 67 state of emergency. 68 (3)âAn electric utility, a public utility, or a water 69 utility must waive reconnection fees and late fees for any 70 residential customer attempting to reestablish utility service 71 after being disconnected for nonpayment if: 72 (a)âThe heat index is at or above 90 degrees Fahrenheit for 73 more than 3 consecutive hours on the day of disconnection; or 74 (b)âThe temperature is at or below 32 degrees Fahrenheit 75 for more than 3 consecutive hours on the day of disconnection. 76 (4)âTo ascertain the forecasted heat index and forecasted 77 temperature as provided in this section, each respective 78 electric utility, public utility, or water utility shall refer 79 to the weather forecast as provided by the National Weather 80 Service for the zip code area where the customer scheduled for 81 disconnection is located. 82 (5)âAn electric utility, a public utility, or a water 83 utility may not disconnect service to any residential customer 84 for nonpayment of bills or fees on a Friday, Saturday, Sunday, 85 state holiday, or day immediately preceding a state holiday. 86 (6)âAn electric utility, a public utility, or a water 87 utility may not recover from its customers any fee or expense it 88 incurs in complying with this section. 89 (7)(a)âAn electric utility, a public utility, or a water 90 utility shall provide its residential customers with a copy of 91 its disconnection for nonpayment policy: 92 1.âWhen a new residential account is established; 93 2.âWhen any disconnection for nonpayment of bills or fees 94 is scheduled. The utilityâs notice of disconnection must include 95 a copy of the policy with the notice; and 96 3.âBy publishing the disconnection for nonpayment policy on 97 the utilityâs website. 98 (b)âAn electric utility shall publish alerts informing its 99 residential customers of the suspension of the disconnection of 100 services due to a forecasted heat index above 90 degrees 101 Fahrenheit, forecasted temperatures below 32 degrees Fahrenheit, 102 or an extreme weather event. 103 (8)âAll notices of nonpayment of bills or fees must provide 104 an offer of bill payment assistance and instructions on how to 105 arrange a payment plan or must provide information to the 106 customer on other available bill payment assistance or energy 107 assistance programs. 108 (9)âAn electric utility, a public utility, or a water 109 utility may not disconnect service for nonpayment of bills or 110 fees for residential customers until a customer account is at 111 least 60 days past due. 112 (10)âThis section may not be construed to limit an electric 113 utility, a public utility, or a water utility from voluntarily 114 suspending scheduled disconnections during other extreme weather 115 events, emergency conditions, incidents pursuant to s. 366.15(5) 116 or (6), or circumstances in which it determines that such 117 suspension is necessary to protect the health and safety of its 118 customers and the reliability of its service in this state. 119 Further, this section may not be construed to prohibit emergency 120 disconnections for health and safety purposes or the occurrence 121 of an automatic service suspension associated with prepaid 122 utility service. 123 (11)(a)âAn electric utility, a public utility, or a water 124 utility that violates this section is liable to the unlawfully 125 disconnected residential customer for actual and consequential 126 damages or $1,000, whichever is greater, and court costs, 127 including attorney fees, in addition to any penalties imposed 128 pursuant to s. 366.095. Subsequent or repeated violations 129 unrelated to the initial violation are subject to separate 130 awards of damages. Any applicable sovereign immunity is hereby 131 waived for the purposes of this section. 132 (b)âA violation of this section constitutes irreparable 133 harm for the purposes of injunctive relief. 134 (c)âThe remedies provided by this section are not exclusive 135 and do not preclude a disconnected residential customer from 136 pursuing any other remedy at law or equity which may be 137 available to the customer. 138 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.